Illinois, session 104th, HB3057.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the 5Freedom to Train Act. 6    Section 5. Definitions. As used in this Act:7    "Employer" means any individual, partnership, association, 8corporation, business trust, governmental or 9quasi-governmental body, or any person or group of persons 10that employs any person to work, labor, or exercise skill in 11connection with the operation of any business, industry, 12vocation, or occupation.13    "State-supported institution of higher learning" means the 14University of Illinois, Southern Illinois University, Chicago 15State University, Eastern Illinois University, Governors State 16University, Illinois State University, Northeastern Illinois 17University, Northern Illinois University, Western Illinois 18University, and the public community colleges subject to the 19Public Community College Act. 20    Section 10. DEI policies and practices.21    (a) Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, 22employers in this State may establish, maintain, and implement   HB3057- 2 -LRB104 09382 JRC 19441 b1policies, practices, and requirements for the employment and 2conduct of employees in the workplace that are designed to 3safeguard employees and applicants for employment from 4discrimination based on race, creed, color, religion, sex, 5age, national origin, sexual orientation, or gender identity. 6The policies, practices, and requirements described in this 7Section may be developed and administered through an office of 8diversity, equity, and inclusion or another administrative 9office or program established by the employer.10    (b) Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, 11State-supported institutions of higher learning may establish, 12maintain, and implement policies, practices, and requirements 13for the conduct of the students, faculty, and staff on the 14campus of the State-supported institution of higher learning 15that are designed to safeguard students, faculty, and staff 16from discrimination based on race, creed, color, religion, 17sex, age, national origin, sexual orientation, or gender 18identity. The policies, practices, and requirements described 19in this Section may be developed and administered through an 20office of diversity, equity, and inclusion, or another 21administrative office or program established by the governing 22board of the State-supported institution of higher learning. 23    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 24becoming law.